dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi pronomenali (takai senŧa èle vanesente)
SFX P4 Y 153
SFX P4 0 lo r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 0 la r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 0 li r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 0 le r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 ar àrgel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ar àrgelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ar àrgeli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ar àrgela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ar àrgele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ar àrmel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrmelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrmeli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrmela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrmele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrsel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrselo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrseli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrsela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrsele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrtel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrtelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrteli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrtela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrtele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrvel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrvelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrveli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrvela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ar àrvele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érgel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 er érgelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 er érgeli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 er érgela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 er érgele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 er érmel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érmelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érmeli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érmela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érmele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érsel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érselo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érseli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érsela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érsele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er értel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er értelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érteli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er értela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er értele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érvel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érvelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érveli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érvela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 er érvele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írgel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ir írgelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ir írgeli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ir írgela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ir írgele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 ir írmel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írmelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írmeli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írmela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írmele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írsel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írselo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írseli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írsela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írsele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írtel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írtelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írteli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írtela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írtele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írvel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írvelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írveli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írvela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 ir írvele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel lo [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 gel la [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 gel li [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 gel le [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P4 gel mel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel melo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel mela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel meli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel mele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel sel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel selo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel sela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel seli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel sele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel tel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel telo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel tela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel teli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel tele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel vel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel velo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel vela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel veli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 gel vele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi gel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 mi gelo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 mi geli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 mi gela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 mi gele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 i el omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 i elo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 i eli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 i ela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 i ele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi sel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi selo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi seli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi sela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi sele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi tel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi telo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi teli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi tela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi tele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi vel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi velo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi veli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi vela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 mi vele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 gel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 0 gelo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 0 geli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 0 gela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 0 gele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P4 0 mel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 melo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 meli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 mela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 mele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 sel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 selo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 seli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 sela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 sele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 tel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 telo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 teli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 tela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 tele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 vel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 velo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 veli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 vela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P4 0 vele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
